North Carolina, session 2025, HB381.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 130A-334 reads as rewritten:
"§ 130A-334. Definitions.
The following definitions shall apply throughout this Article:
(1) "Accepted wastewater system" has the same meaning as in G.S. 130A-343.
(1a) "Advanced pretreatment" means any biological, chemical, or physical process
or system used in addition to or in place of a septic tank. Advanced
pretreatment includes, but is not limited to, aeration, clarification, digestion,
disinfection, filtration, separation, and settling. Advanced pretreatment
effluent shall meet the treatment standards adopted by the Commission for
better than septic tank effluent quality. Advanced pretreatment shall be part of
a ground absorption system.
(1b) "Approved agency for special inspection" means an individual, corporation,
company, association, or partnership that is objective, competent, and
independent from the contractor who is responsible for the work that is
inspected. The agency shall disclose possible conflicts of interest in a manner
such that objectivity can be confirmed.
(1b)(1c) "Approved special inspector" means a person who demonstrates
competence to the satisfaction of the professional engineer who designed the
wastewater system for the inspection of the construction or operation subject
to special inspection.
(1c)(1d) "Construction" means any work at the site of placement done for the
purpose of preparing a residence, place of business or place of public assembly
for initial occupancy, or subsequent additions or modifications which increase
sewage flow.
(1d)(1e) "Construction observation" means the visual observation of the
construction and installation of the wastewater system for general
conformance with the construction documents prepared by the professional
engineer who designed the wastewater system. Construction observation that
is conducted by the professional engineer who designed the wastewater
*H381-v-3*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
system does not include or waive the requirement to conduct special
inspections.
(1e)(1f) "Conventional wastewater system" has the same meaning as in
G.S. 130A-343.
(1f)(1g) "Department" means the Department of Health and Human Services.
(1g)(1h) "Engineered option permit" means an on-site wastewater system that is
permitted pursuant to the rules adopted by the Commission in accordance with
this Article, meets the criteria established by G.S. 130A-336.1, and is
designed by a professional engineer who is licensed under Chapter 89C of the
General Statutes who has expertise in the design of on-site wastewater
systems.
(1h)(1i) "Ground absorption system" means a system of tanks, treatment units,
nitrification fields, and appurtenances for wastewater collection, treatment,
and subsurface disposal.
…
(7b) "Pretreatment" means any biological, chemical, or physical process or system
for improving wastewater quality and reducing wastewater constituents prior
to final treatment and disposal in a subsurface wastewater system and
includes, but is not limited to aeration, clarification, digestion, disinfection,
filtration, separation, and settling.
…."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 130A-335(f) reads as rewritten:
"(f) The rules of the Commission and the rules of the local board of health shall classify
systems of wastewater collection, treatment and disposal according to size, type of treatment and
any other appropriate factors. The rules shall provide construction requirements, including
advanced pretreatment and system control requirements, standards for operation, maintenance,
monitoring, reporting, and ownership requirements for each classification of systems of
wastewater collection, treatment and disposal in order to prevent, as far as reasonably possible,
any contamination of the land, groundwater and surface waters. The Department and local health
departments may impose conditions on the issuance of permits and may revoke the permits for
failure of the system to satisfy the conditions, the rules, or this Article. Permits other than
improvement permits shall be valid for a period prescribed by rule. Improvement permits shall
be valid upon a showing satisfactory to the Department or the local health department that the
site and soil conditions are unaltered, that the facility, design wastewater flow, and wastewater
characteristics are not increased, and that a wastewater system can be installed that meets the
permitting requirements in effect on the date the Improvement Permit was issued. Improvement
permits for which a plat is provided shall be valid without expiration. Improvement permits for
which a site plan is provided shall be valid for five years. The period of time for which the permit
is valid and a statement that the permit is subject to revocation if the site plan or plat, whichever
is applicable, or the intended use changes shall be displayed prominently on both the application
form for the permit and the permit."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 130A-336.1(e)(1) reads as rewritten:
"(1) The professional engineer designing the proposed wastewater system shall use
recognized principles and practices of engineering and applicable rules of the
Commission in the calculations and design of the wastewater system. The
investigations and findings of the professional engineer shall include, at a
minimum, the information required in rules adopted by the Commission
pursuant to G.S. 130A-335(e). The professional engineer may, at the
engineer's discretion, employ advanced pretreatment technologies not yet
approved in this State."
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 130A-343(g) reads as rewritten:
Page 2 House Bill 381-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(g) Innovative Systems. – A manufacturer of a wastewater system for on-site subsurface
use may apply for and be considered for innovative system status by the Department in one of
the following ways:
(1) If the wastewater system has been approved as a provisional wastewater
system pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, the manufacturer may apply
to have the system approved as an innovative wastewater system based on
successful completion of the evaluation protocols established pursuant to
subsection (d) of this section.
(2) If the wastewater system has not been evaluated or approved as a provisional
wastewater system pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, the manufacturer
may apply to the Department to have the system approved as an innovative
wastewater system on the basis of comparable research and testing conducted
in other states. The manufacturer shall provide the Department with the data
and findings of all evaluations of the performance of the system that have been
conducted in any state by or on behalf of the manufacturer. The manufacturer
shall also provide the Department with a summary of the data and findings of
all other evaluations of the performance of the system that are known to the
manufacturer.
(3) If the wastewater system advanced pretreatment system has not been
evaluated or approved as a provisional system pursuant to subsection (f) of
this section, but has been evaluated approved under protocol established by a
nationally recognized certification body for at least two consecutive years,
body, has been found to perform acceptably based on the criteria of the
protocol, and is designed and will be installed in a manner consistent with the
system evaluated and approved by the nationally recognized certification
body, the manufacturer may apply to have the system approved as an
innovative wastewater system.system, and the Department shall approve the
application and issue an innovative wastewater system approval in accordance
with rules adopted by the Commission upon verifying (i) the protocol testing
dataset includes a minimum of 55 influent and effluent datasets that include
the applicable constituents identified in rules adopted by the Commission and
obtained from testing for a minimum of 26 weeks, with protocol sampling
conducted during all weeks of the testing period, (ii) the protocol testing data
complies with the applicable effluent standards identified in rules adopted by
the Commission, (iii) the nationally recognized certification body's approval,
and (iv) that the design and installation plans are consistent with that approval.
When a separate disinfection process or system is proposed, fecal coliform
datasets are not required if the disinfection technology is approved by a
nationally recognized certified body. This subdivision shall not apply to a
manufacturer requesting innovative approval as both an advanced
pretreatment and dispersal system.
…."
SECTION 2.(b) The Commission for Public Health may adopt temporary and
permanent rules to implement this section.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to applications
for innovative wastewater system approval filed with the Commission on or after that date.
House Bill 381-Third Edition Page 3